Georgia statutes. TITLE 4 Animals
CHAPTER 7 Hatchery Operators and Dealers

Cross references.

Regulation of sales of eggs, §

26-2-260

et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Poultry processing, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-10-2. Poultry flock, hatchery and dealer regulations, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-13-10-.03.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of business associations, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 57 (1986).

4-7-1.
Designation of official state agency for administration of national improvement plans; participation by hatcheries and the like in national plans; state plan; use of certain words in advertising or offering of hatching eggs, chicks, poults, or breeding stock.

The Georgia Poultry Improvement Association, Inc., shall be recognized and designated as the official state agency for administration of the National Poultry Improvement Plan sponsored by the secretary of agriculture, United States Department of Agriculture. Participation in the National Poultry Improvement Plan by hatcheries, breeders, dealers, and supply flock owners shall be voluntary and administrated and governed by the rules and regulations of the official state agency in conjunction with rules and regulations promulgated by the secretary of agriculture, United States Department of Agriculture.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to establish a state plan of identification of hatcheries, dealers, or supply flocks, except as specified in this chapter.

The words “state approved,” “state tested,” or words or phrases of similar implication and meaning shall not be used in advertising or in the sale or offering for sale of hatching eggs, chicks, poults, or breeding stock.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 147, § 1.

4-7-2.
Pullorum disease control.

Regulations for control and eradication of pullorum disease shall be made following a joint hearing between the Commissioner and the Georgia Poultry Improvement Association, Inc. Requirements for pullorum disease testing and other sanitary measures shall be set by the Commissioner. In the event that state regulations do not exist or apply, the minimum pullorum disease control regulations of the Georgia Poultry Improvement Association, Inc., shall be effective.

The Commissioner shall be authorized to quarantine and prohibit the sale or shipment of hatching eggs, chicks, poults, poultry breeding stock, or birds of any species to or from any hatchery, dealer, or flock or in any area within the state. The Commissioner shall be authorized to promulgate special regulations for prevention and spread of pullorum disease or other infectious or contagious diseases of poultry.

Appointment of qualified pullorum disease testing agents and supervision of their field work shall be made by the Commissioner. Only persons who have demonstrated that they are capable of doing satisfactory testing work shall be so authorized.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 147, § 2.

4-7-3.
Licenses.

Every person, firm, corporation, or dealer who operates a hatchery shall first register and secure a permanent license from the Commissioner. The fee for such permanent license shall be fixed by the Commissioner in an amount not to exceed $10.00 for each hatchery, dealer, or branch. The license shall be conspicuously displayed in each place of business. The license shall not be transferable. When any condition is revealed to exist which is not in strict accord with this chapter, the license may be revoked or suspended by the Commissioner, in his discretion.

Manufacturers of poultry remedies, before offering for sale each of such remedies in the state for treatment, eradication, or control of poultry diseases, shall first secure a license from and be approved by the Commissioner, at his discretion. The fee for such license shall be $1.00 for each remedy.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 147, § 3; Ga. L. 1969, p. 856, § 1.

4-7-4.
Reports of contagious diseases; inspection of premises.

Hatcheries, dealers, and flock owners shall promptly report to the Commissioner the outbreak of any contagious or infectious disease affecting chicks, poults, or breeding stock in their possession or in any flock producing hatching eggs.

The premises and equipment of hatcheries and dealers shall be subject to inspection by the Commissioner; and access to any supply flock shall be granted to the inspectors of the department at any reasonable time during the business day to see that minimum requirements of sanitary and disease control regulations are maintained and enforced.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 147, § 4.

4-7-5.
Use of sulfaguanidine and sulfathiazole.

It shall be lawful in this state for any recognized poultry flock owners to buy and use sulfaguanidine and sulfathiazole in original packages in powdered form only for their own requirements in the treatment of poultry diseases. Dealers in poultry supplies may buy and sell sulfaguanidine and sulfathiazole.

No person, firm, or corporation in this state shall sell or offer for sale sulfaguanidine or sulfathiazole unless each is plainly labeled with the words “For Poultry Only.”

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 135, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references.

Use of drugs of the sulfanilamide or sulfonamide group for use in control of poultry diseases, §

26-4-6

.

4-7-6.
Shipments of hatching eggs, chicks, poults, poultry breeding stock, or birds of any species into state.

Hatching eggs, chicks, poults, poultry breeding stock, or birds of any species shall not be shipped into the State of Georgia without first obtaining the approval of the Commissioner. Shippers shall be subject to investigation by the Commissioner or other authorized person to determine that hatching eggs, chicks, poults, or poultry breeding stock have been produced and handled under conditions no less adequate for control of pullorum disease and other contagious or infectious diseases of poultry than those required under Georgia regulations.

Hatching eggs, chicks, poults, or poultry breeding stock shipped into the State of Georgia shall be:

Reported by the shipper to the Commissioner on official health certificates signed by the livestock sanitary official in the state of origin, certifying that such shipment has met requirements equivalent to Georgia regulations for control of pullorum disease and other contagious or infectious diseases of poultry; a duplicate copy of the health certificate shall be attached to the waybill on each shipment; or

Reported to the Commissioner on official National Poultry Improvement Plan forms, if produced under a pullorum disease control phase of the National Poultry Improvement Plan.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 147, § 5.

4-7-7.
Effect of chapter on Commissioner’s authority to control and eradicate livestock and poultry diseases.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed so as to limit in any manner the authority of the Commissioner to carry out, administer, and enforce all laws, rules, and regulations for the control and eradication of livestock and poultry diseases in this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 147, § 6.

4-7-8.
Penalty for violations of chapter; disposal of hatching eggs or birds not in compliance with chapter.

Any person, firm, or corporation found to be in violation of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor. The Commissioner may, at his discretion, confiscate, destroy, or otherwise dispose of all hatching eggs, chicks, poults, poultry breeding stock, or birds of any species that are produced in the state or enter the state but are not in compliance with this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 147, § 7.